bg-BG: Форма на продукта за таванна облицовка: Пълен комплект тапицерия за таван; Плат за тапицерия на таван; Плат за тапицерия на таван с подплата от пяна; Подплата от пяна за тапицерия на таван; Други
zh-CN: 车顶衬里产品形态: 完整车顶内衬总成; 车顶内衬面料; 带泡沫背衬的车顶内衬面料; 车顶内衬泡沫背衬; 其他
nl: Hemelbekleding productvorm: Complete hemelbekleding; Hemelbekledingsstof; Hemelbekledingsstof met schuimrug; Schuimrug voor hemelbekleding; Overig
es: Forma del revestimiento de techo: Montaje completo del revestimiento del techo; Tela para el revestimiento del techo; Tela para revestimiento del techo con respaldo de espuma; Respaldo de espuma para revestimiento del techo; Otro
ja: ヘッドライナー商品フォーム: コンプリートヘッドライナーアセンブリ; ヘッドライナーファブリック; フォームバッキング付きヘッドライナーファブリック; ヘッドライナーフォームバッキング; その他
ro-RO: Forma produsului pentru plafon auto: Ansamblu complet de plafon; Material textil pentru plafon; Material textil pentru plafon cu strat de spumă; Strat de spumă pentru plafon; Altele
pt-BR: Formato do revestimento do teto: Conjunto completo de forro de teto; Tecido de forro de teto; Tecido de forro de teto com fundo de espuma; Fundo de espuma de forro de teto; Outro
zh-TW: 車頂內襯商品形式: 完整車頂篷總成; 車頂篷布料; 具泡綿背襯的車頂篷布料; 車頂篷泡綿背襯; 其他
pl: Forma produktu podsufitki: Kompletny zespół podsufitki; Materiał podsufitki; Materiał podsufitki z podkładem piankowym; Piankowy podkład podsufitki; Inny
ru: Форма обивки потолка: Потолок в сборе; Потолочная ткань; Потолочная ткань на поролоновой основе; Поролоновая основа для потолка; Другое
th: รูปแบบผลิตภัณฑ์แผ่นบุหลังคา: ชุดประกอบเพดานหลังคารถ; ผ้าบุหลังคารถ; ผ้าบุหลังคารถแบบมีแผ่นโฟมรอง; แผ่นโฟมรองบุหลังคารถ; อื่นๆ
tr: Tavan döşemesi ürün formu: Tam tavan kaplaması tertibatı; Tavan kaplaması kumaşı; Köpük destekli tavan kaplaması kumaşı; Tavan kaplaması köpük desteği; Diğer
it: Formato del prodotto copriparafango: Rivestimento cielo completo; Tessuto per cielo; Tessuto per cielo accoppiato con spugna; Spugna per cielo; Altro
hu: Tetőkárpit termékformája: Teljes tetőkárpit-szerelvény; Tetőkárpit szövet; Tetőkárpit szövet habszivacs hátlappal; Tetőkárpit habszivacs hátlap; Egyéb
en: Headliner product form: Complete headliner assembly; Headliner fabric; Headliner fabric with foam backing; Headliner foam backing; Other
cs: Formulář pro hlavní produkt: Kompletní stropní panel; Potahová látka na stropnici; Potahová látka na stropnici s pěnovou podložkou; Pěnová podložka stropnice; Jiné
sk-SK: Forma hlavného produktu: Kompletná zostava stropnice; Látka stropnice; Látka stropnice s penovým podkladom; Penový podklad stropnice; Iné
da: Loftbeklædningsproduktform: Komplet loftsbeklædning; Stof til loftsbeklædning; Stof til loftsbeklædning med skumbagside; Skumbagside til loftsbeklædning; Andet
el: Μορφή προϊόντος επένδυσης οροφής: Πλήρες συγκρότημα ουρανού; Ύφασμα ουρανού; Ύφασμα ουρανού με υπόστρωμα αφρού; Υπόστρωμα αφρού ουρανού; Άλλο
lt-LT: Stogo apmušalo produkto forma: Visas stogo apmušalo komplektas; Stogo apmušalo audinys; Stogo apmušalo audinys su porolono pagrindu; Stogo apmušalo porolono pagrindas; Kita
sv: Takklädsel – form: Komplett innertaksmontering; Innertakstyg; Innertakstyg med skumbaksida; Innertaksskum; Övrigt
hr-HR: Oblik proizvoda za oblogu krova (headliner): Potpuni sklop krovne obloge; Tkanina krovne obloge; Tkanina krovne obloge s pjenastom podlogom; Pjenasta podloga krovne obloge; Ostalo
fi: Kattoverhoilun tuotemuoto: Täydellinen kattoverhoilu; Kattoverhoilukangas; Kattoverhoilukangas vaahtomuovitaustalla; Kattoverhoilun vaahtomuovitausta; Muu
ko: 헤드라이너 제품 형태: 헤드라이너 조립품 전체; 헤드라이너 패브릭; 폼 안감 처리된 헤드라이너 패브릭; 헤드라이너 폼 안감; 기타
pt-PT: Formato do produto do forro de tejadilho: Conjunto completo do forro do tejadilho; Tecido para forro do tejadilho; Tecido para forro do tejadilho com reforço de espuma; Reforço de espuma para forro do tejadilho; Outro
nb: Produktformat for takinteriør: Komplett taktrekkmontering; Taktrekkstoff; Taktrekkstoff med skumbakside; Skumbakside for taktrekk; Annet
de: Dachhimmel-Produktform: Komplette Dachhimmel-Baugruppe; Dachhimmel-Stoff; Dachhimmel-Stoff mit Schaumstoffrücken; Dachhimmel-Schaumstoffrücken; Sonstige
fr: Formulaire de produit phare: Ensemble de ciel de toit complet; Tissu de ciel de toit; Tissu de ciel de toit avec envers en mousse; Envers en mousse pour ciel de toit; Autre
sl-SI: Oblika izdelka za stropno oblogo: Celoten sklop stropne obloge; Tkanina za stropno oblogo; Tkanina za stropno oblogo s penasto podlago; Penasta podlaga za stropno oblogo; Drugo
vi: Hình thức sản phẩm lót trần: Cụm trần xe hoàn chỉnh; Vải bọc trần xe; Vải bọc trần xe có lớp đệm mút; Lớp đệm mút trần xe; Khác